Missouri, session 2026, HB3501.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 10, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 10.290, to read as follows:
10.290. Barbecue sauce produced by Show-Me Bar-B-Q headquartered in
2 Rocheport is selected for and shall be known as the official barbecue sauce for the state
3 of Missouri.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.